North Carolina, session 2025, SB512.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 145 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 145-52. Official hip hop song.
The censored version of the song "Raise Up" by North Carolina rapper Petey Pablo is adopted
as the official hip hop song of the State of North Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S512-v-1*